test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-miinstar_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - miinstâr: # 2A
    miinstâr+N+Sg+Nom: miinstâr
    miinstâr+N+Sg+Gen: minstâr
    miinstâr+N+Sg+Acc: minstâr
    miinstâr+N+Sg+Ill: minstârân
    miinstâr+N+Sg+Loc: minstârist
    miinstâr+N+Sg+Com: minstâráin
    miinstâr+N+Sg+Abe: minstârttáá
    miinstâr+N+Ess:    minstârin
    miinstâr+N+Par:    minstârid
    miinstâr+N+Pl+Nom: minstâreh
    miinstâr+N+Pl+Gen: minstârij
    miinstâr+N+Pl+Acc: minstârijd
    miinstâr+N+Pl+Ill: minstâráid
    miinstâr+N+Pl+Loc: minstârijn
    miinstâr+N+Pl+Com: minstârijguin
    miinstâr+N+Pl+Abe: minstârijttáá
